North Dakota, session 69, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - REGULATION OF CELL-CULTURED
PROTEIN. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying cell-cultured
protein and the status of litigation in federal and state courts to prohibit cell-cultured protein. The study
must include the outcome of litigation in other states and an analysis of the regulatory landscape,
stakeholder impact, and feasibility of adopting a prohibition on cell-cultured protein in the state. The
legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1151 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1151.
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 10 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State